Tennessee, session 114, SB2172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-13-108(a), is amended by
deleting "two (2) years" and substituting "twenty-seven (27) months".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2172
009881
- 1 -